Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.25.040

Treasurer. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) Each candidate, within two weeks after becoming a candidate, and each political committee, at the time it is required to file a statement of organization, shall designate and file with the commission the name and address of one legally competent individual, who may be the candidate, to serve as a treasurer.

(2) A candidate, a political committee, or a treasurer may appoint as many deputy treasurers as is considered necessary and shall file the names and addresses of the deputy treasurers with the commission.

(3)(a) A candidate or political committee may at any time remove a treasurer or deputy treasurer.

(b) In the event of the death, resignation, removal, or change of a treasurer or deputy treasurer, the candidate or political committee shall designate and file with the commission the name and address of any successor.

(4) No treasurer or deputy treasurer may be deemed to be in compliance with the provisions of this title until the treasurer's or deputy treasurer's name, address, and electronic contact information is filed with the commission.

[ 2024 c 164 s 421; 2019 c 428 s 16. Prior: 2010 c 205 s 2; 2010 c 204 s 403; 1989 c 280 s 3; 1985 c 367 s 3; 1982 c 147 s 2; 1973 c 1 s 5 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.210, 42.17.050.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—1989 c 280: See note following RCW 29B.25.010.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.